lt-LT: Gitaros dėklo stilius: Dvigubas gitaros krepšys; Skrydžio / ATA dėklas; Kietas dėklas; Lietas dėklas; Pusiau kietas / hibridinis dėklas; Įmautė; Minkštas gitaros krepšys; Kita
pl: Styl futerału gitarowego: Pokrowiec na dwie gitary (Gig bag); Skrzynia transportowa / ATA; Twardy futerał; Profilowany futerał; Futerał półsztywny / hybrydowy; Wsuwka; Miękki pokrowiec (Gig bag); Inne
sl-SI: Stil kovčka za kitaro: Mehka torba za dve kitari; Potovalni kovček/kovček ATA; Trdi kovček; Oblikovan kovček; Poltrdi/hibridni kovček; Ovoj; Mehka torba (gig bag); Drugo
el: Στυλ θήκης κιθάρας: Θήκη gig bag για δύο κιθάρες; Flight case/Θήκη ATA; Σκληρή θήκη; Χυτή θήκη; Ημίσκληρη/Υβριδική θήκη; Θήκη-μανίκι (Sleeve); Μαλακή θήκη (gig bag); Άλλο
pt-PT: Guitarra caixa interna estilo: Saco de transporte para duas guitarras; Flight case/estojo ATA; Estojo rígido; Estojo moldado; Estojo semirrígido/híbrido; Capa; Saco de transporte macio; Outro
fr: Style d’étui de guitare: Housse double pour guitare; Flight case/étui ATA; Étui rigide; Étui moulé; Étui semi-rigide/hybride; Housse; Housse souple; Autre
tr: Gitar kılıfı stili: Çift gitar kılıfı; Uçuş çantası/ATA çantası; Sert kılıf; Kalıplı kılıf; Yarı sert/hibrit kılıf; Kılıf; Yumuşak kılıf; Diğer
de: Stil des Gitarrenkoffers: Doppel-Gitarren-Gigbag; Flightcase/ATA-Case; Hartschalenkoffer; Formkoffer; Halbstarrer/Hybrid-Koffer; Hülle; Weiches Gigbag; Sonstige
bg-BG: Стил на калъфа за китара: Мек калъф за две китари; Транспортен куфар (flight case/ATA); Твърд куфар; Формован куфар; Полутвърд/хибриден куфар; Калъф тип ръкав; Мек калъф; Други
es: Estilo de estuche de guitarra: Funda doble para guitarra; Flight case / estuche ATA; Estuche rígido; Estuche moldeado; Estuche semirrígido/híbrido; Funda; Funda suave; Otro
zh-TW: 吉他盒款式: 雙吉他琴袋; 飛行盒/ATA 航空箱; 硬殼琴盒; 開模琴盒; 半硬/混合琴盒; 琴套; 軟吉他袋; 其他
hu: Gitártok stílusa: Dupla puha gitártok; Szállítóláda/ATA-tok; Keménytok; Öntött tok; Félkemény/hibrid tok; Védőhuzat; Puhatok; Egyéb
da: Type af guitarkasse: Gigbag til to guitarer; Flightcase/ATA-kasse; Hardcase; Støbt etui; Halvstivt etui/hybrid-etui; Sleeve; Blød gigbag; Andet
th: สไตล์เคสกีตาร์: กิ๊กแบ็กกีตาร์คู่; เคสแบบโหลดขึ้นเครื่อง/เคส ATA; ฮาร์ดเคส; เคสขึ้นรูป; เคสกึ่งแข็ง/ไฮบริด; ซองใส่; ซอฟต์กิ๊กแบ็ก; อื่นๆ
it: Tipo di cassa della chitarra: Custodia morbida per doppia chitarra; Flight case/Custodia ATA; Custodia rigida; Custodia sagomata; Custodia semirigida/ibrida; Sleeve; Custodia morbida; Altro
cs: Styl pouzdra/kufru pro kytaru: Dvojitý gigbag na kytaru; Letecký kufr / kufr ATA; Pevný kufr; Tvarovaný kufr; Polotvrdé/hybridní pouzdro; Obal; Měkký gigbag; Ostatní
en: Guitar case style: Double guitar gig bag; Flight case/ATA case; Hard case; Molded case; Semi-rigid/Hybrid case; Sleeve; Soft gig bag; Other
zh-CN: 吉他琴箱款式: 双吉他便携包; 航空箱/ATA 琴盒; 硬质琴盒; 模压琴盒; 半硬质/混合琴盒; 保护套; 软质便携包; 其他
ko: 기타 케이스 스타일: 더블 기타 긱백; 플라이트 케이스/ATA 케이스; 하드 케이스; 몰딩 케이스; 반경질/하이브리드 케이스; 슬리브; 소프트 긱백; 기타
pt-BR: Guitarra estojo estilo: Capa para duas guitarras; Flight case/Estojo ATA; Estojo rígido; Estojo moldado; Estojo semirrígido/híbrido; Capa simples; Capa flexível; Outro
ja: ギターケーススタイル: ダブルギターギグバッグ; フライトケース/ATAケース; ハードケース; モールドケース; セミリジッド/ハイブリッドケース; スリーブ; ソフトギグバッグ; その他
sv: Typ av gitarrfodral: Gigbag för två gitarrer; Flightcase/ATA-case; Hårt fodral; Gjutet fodral; Halvstyvt/hybridfodral; Sleeve; Mjuk gigbag; Övrigt
sk-SK: Štýl puzdra na gitaru: Obal na dve gitary; Letecký kufor/kufor ATA; Tvrdý kufor; Tvarovaný kufor; Polotvrdý/hybridný kufor; Puzdro; Mäkký obal; Iné
nb: Gitar eske-stil: Dobbel gigbag for gitar; Flightcase/ATA-kasse; Hard kasse; Støpt kasse; Halvstiv/hybrid kasse; Trekk; Myk gigbag; Annet
hr-HR: Gitara u kutija stilu: Dvostruka meka torba za gitaru; Transportni kofer (Flight/ATA); Tvrdi kofer; Kalupljeni kofer; Polutvrdi/hibridni kofer; Navlaka; Meka torba; Ostalo
ro-RO: Tipul/ stilul husei sau al casei pentru chitară: Husă dublă pentru chitară; Toc de zbor/Toc ATA; Toc rigid; Toc mulat; Toc semirigid/Hibrid; Husă tip mânecă; Husă moale de transport; Altele
ru: Тип кейса для гитары: Чехол для двух гитар; Транспортировочный кейс (Flight case); Жесткий кейс; Литой кейс; Полужесткий/гибридный чехол; Чехол-рукав; Мягкий чехол; Другое
fi: Kitarakotelon tyyli: Kahden kitaran keikkalaukku; Lentolaukku / ATA-laukku; Kova laukku; Muotoiltu laukku; Puolikova/hybridilaukku; Suojatasku; Pehmeä keikkalaukku; Muu
nl: Gitaarhoes stijl: Gigbag voor dubbele gitaar; Flightcase/ATA-koffer; Harde koffer; Gevormde koffer; Halfharde/hybride koffer; Sleeve; Zachte gigbag; Overig
vi: Kiểu hộp đựng đàn guitar: Bao đựng đàn guitar đôi; Hộp chống sốc (Flight case/ATA case); Hộp cứng; Hộp đúc; Hộp bán cứng/Lai; Bao chống sốc mỏng (Sleeve); Bao mềm; Khác